Massachusetts, session 194th, H4686.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Chapter 111 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following section:- 
Section 245. There is hereby established a commission to research topical steroid 
addiction and Topical Steroid Withdrawal Syndrome, a severe and debilitating condition that can 
result from intentional or unintentional exposure to topical steroids.  
The commissioner shall have 1 member who is a representative of the department and 7 
members appointed by the governor, 1 of whom shall be a dermatologist, 1 of whom shall be a 
licensed pediatrician, 1 of whom shall be a licensed pharmacist, 1 of whom shall be a licensed 
immunologist and 3 of whom shall be individuals or parents who have been impacted by Topical 
Steroid Withdrawal Syndrome.  
The special commission may conduct public hearings, forums, or meetings to gather 
information regarding medical protocols for prevention, early detection and treatment of Topical 

of 2 12 Steroid Withdrawal Syndrome and generate awareness of the condition among health care 
providers, patients and consumers when prescribing medications. 
Annually, on or before June 30, the commission shall submit a report to the governor and 
the clerks of the house of representatives and the senate who shall forward the same to the joint 
committee on public health, along with recommendations, if any, together with drafts of 
legislation necessary to carry out those recommendations into effect. The special commission 
may file such interim reports and recommendations as it considers appropriate.